New York, session 2025-2026, A10959.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (i) of subdivision 1 of section 414 of the educa- 2 tion law, as amended by chapter 106 of the laws of 2000, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 (i) To provide child care services during school and non-school 5 hours[, or to provide child care services during school hours for the 6 children of pupils attending the schools of the district and, if there 7 is additional space available, for children of employees of the 8 district, and, if there is further additional space available, the 9 Cobleskill-Richmondville school district shall provide child care 10 services for children ages three and four who need child care assistance 11 due to lack of sufficient child care spaces]. Such determination shall 12 be made by each district's board of education, provided that the cost of 13 such care shall not be a school district charge but shall be paid by the 14 person responsible for the support of such child; the local social 15 services district as authorized by law; or by any other public or 16 private voluntary source or any combination thereof. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect eighteen months after it shall have 18 become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15428-02-6